test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_VV_makomii_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinyminaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinyminaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiinsminaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinsminaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinsminaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinyminaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinyminaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinyminaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinymiwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinymiwaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinymiwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinsminaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsminaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsminaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinsmiwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsmiwaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsmiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiinymiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiinymiwaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiinymiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: makmiinyminwibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiinyminwibniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiinyminwibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiinsmiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiinsmiwaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiinsmiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: makmiinsminwibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiinsminwibniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiinsminwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiinyshinaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinyshinaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinyshinaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiinsshinaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinsshinaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinsshinaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinyshinaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinyshinaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinyshinaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinyshiwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinyshiwaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinyshiwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinsshinaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsshinaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsshinaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinsshiwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsshiwaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsshiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiinyshiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiinyshiwaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiinyshiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makmiinyshinwibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiinyshinwibniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiinyshinwibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiinsshiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiinsshiwaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiinsshiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makmiinsshinwibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiinsshinwibniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiinsshinwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiimshinaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiimshinaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiimshinaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiimshinaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiimshinaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiimshinaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiimshiwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiimshiwaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiimshiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiimshiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiimshiwaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiimshiwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makmiimshinwibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiimshinwibniing
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiimshinwibniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiinymishnaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinymishnaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinymishnaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakmiinsmishnaanbaniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakmiinsmishnaanbaniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakmiinsmishnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinymishnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinymishnaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinymishnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinymishwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinymishwaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinymishwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinsmishnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsmishnaanbaniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsmishnaanbaniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakmiinsmishwaabniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakmiinsmishwaabniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakmiinsmishwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiinymishwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiinymishwaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiinymishwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makmiinymishniwbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiinymishniwbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiinymishniwbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makmiinsmishwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makmiinsmishwaabniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makmiinsmishwaabniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makmiinsmishniwbaniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makmiinsmishniwbaniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makmiinsmishniwbaniin
     
